vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX c0 émer èmeriez/ émer
SFX c0 éner èneriez/ éner
SFX c0 éper èperiez/ éper
SFX c0 équer èqueriez/ équer
SFX c0 érer èreriez/ érer
SFX c0 éser èseriez/ éser
SFX c0 éter èteriez/ éter
SFX c0 étrer ètreriez/ étrer
SFX c0 évrer èvreriez/ évrer
SFX c0 éyer èyeriez/ éyer
SFX c0 er eraient/ er
SFX c0 ébrer èbreraient/ ébrer
SFX c0 écer èceraient/ écer
SFX c0 écher ècheraient/ écher
SFX c0 écrer ècreraient/ écrer
SFX c0 éder èderaient/ éder
SFX c0 éger ègeraient/ éger
SFX c0 égler ègleraient/ égler
SFX c0 égner ègneraient/ égner
SFX c0 égrer ègreraient/ égrer
SFX c0 éguer ègueraient/ éguer
SFX c0 éler èleraient/ éler
SFX c0 émer èmeraient/ émer
SFX c0 éner èneraient/ éner
SFX c0 éper èperaient/ éper
SFX c0 équer èqueraient/ équer
SFX c0 érer èreraient/ érer
SFX c0 éser èseraient/ éser
SFX c0 éter èteraient/ éter
SFX c0 étrer ètreraient/ étrer
SFX c0 évrer èvreraient/ évrer
SFX c0 éyer èyeraient/ éyer
SFX c0 er asse/ [^cg]er
SFX c0 écer éçasse/ écer
SFX c0 éger égeasse/ éger
SFX c0 er asses/ [^cg]er
SFX c0 écer éçasses/ écer
SFX c0 éger égeasses/ éger
SFX c0 er ât/ [^cg]er
SFX c0 écer éçât/ écer
SFX c0 éger égeât/ éger
SFX c0 er assions/ [^cg]er
SFX c0 écer éçassions/ écer
SFX c0 éger égeassions/ éger
SFX c0 er assiez/ [^cg]er
SFX c0 écer éçassiez/ écer
SFX c0 éger égeassiez/ éger
SFX c0 er assent/ [^cg]er
SFX c0 écer éçassent/ écer
SFX c0 éger égeassent/ éger
SFX c0 ébrer èbre/ ébrer
SFX c0 écer èce/ écer
SFX c0 écher èche/ écher
SFX c0 écrer ècre/ écrer
SFX c0 éder ède/ éder
SFX c0 éger ège/ éger
SFX c0 égler ègle/ égler
SFX c0 égner ègne/ égner
SFX c0 égrer ègre/ égrer
SFX c0 éguer ègue/ éguer
SFX c0 éler èle/ éler
SFX c0 émer ème/ émer
SFX c0 éner ène/ éner
SFX c0 éper èpe/ éper
SFX c0 équer èque/ équer
SFX c0 érer ère/ érer
SFX c0 éser èse/ éser
SFX c0 éter ète/ éter
SFX c0 étrer ètre/ étrer
SFX c0 évrer èvre/ évrer
SFX c0 éyer èye/ éyer
SFX c0 er ons/ [^cg]er
SFX c0 écer éçons/ écer
SFX c0 éger égeons/ éger
SFX c0 er ez/ er

SFX d0 Y 144
SFX d0 er er/ er
SFX d0 er ant/ er
SFX d0 eter ette/ jeter
SFX d0 eter ette/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ète/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elle/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler elle/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èle/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elle/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èle/ épeler
SFX d0 er è/ er
SFX d0 eter ettes/ jeter
SFX d0 eter ettes/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètes/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elles/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler elles/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èles/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elles/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èles/ épeler
SFX d0 er ons/ er
SFX d0 er ez/ er
SFX d0 eter ettent/ jeter
SFX d0 eter ettent/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètent/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellent/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellent/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlent/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellent/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èlent/ épeler
SFX d0 er ais/ er
SFX d0 er ait/ er
SFX d0 er ions/ er
SFX d0 er iez/ er
SFX d0 er aient/ er
SFX d0 er ai/ er
SFX d0 er as/ er
SFX d0 er a/ er
SFX d0 er âmes/ er
SFX d0 er âtes/ er
SFX d0 er èrent/ er
SFX d0 eter etterai/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etterai/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterai/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerai/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerai/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerai/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerai/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerai/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etteras/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etteras/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteras/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleras/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleras/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleras/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elleras/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èleras/ épeler
SFX d0 eter ettera/ jeter
SFX d0 eter ettera/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètera/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellera/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellera/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlera/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellera/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èlera/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etterons/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etterons/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterons/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerons/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerons/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerons/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerons/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerons/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etterez/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etterez/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterez/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerez/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerez/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerez/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerez/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerez/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etteront/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etteront/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteront/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleront/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleront/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleront/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elleront/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èleront/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etterais/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etterais/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterais/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerais/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerais/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerais/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerais/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerais/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etterait/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etterait/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterait/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerait/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerait/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerait/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerait/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerait/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etterions/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etterions/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterions/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerions/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerions/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerions/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerions/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerions/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etteriez/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etteriez/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteriez/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleriez/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleriez/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleriez/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elleriez/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èleriez/ épeler
SFX d0 eter etteraient/ jeter
SFX d0 eter etteraient/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteraient/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleraient/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleraient/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleraient/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elleraient/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èleraient/ épeler
SFX d0 er asse/ er
SFX d0 er asses/ er
SFX d0 er ât/ er
SFX d0 er assions/ er
SFX d0 er assiez/ er
SFX d0 er assent/ er
SFX d0 eter ette/ jeter
SFX d0 eter ette/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ète/ [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elle/ ppeler
SFX d0 eler elle/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èle/ [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elle/ épeler
SFX d0 eler èle/ épeler
SFX d0 er ons/ er
SFX d0 er ez/ er

SFX aA Y 54
SFX aA ller ller/ aller
SFX aA ller llant/ aller
SFX aA ller llé/ aller
SFX aA ller llés/ aller
SFX aA ller llée/ aller
SFX aA ller llées/ aller
SFX aA aller vais/ aller
SFX aA aller vas/ aller
SFX aA aller va/ aller
SFX aA ller llons/ aller
SFX aA ller llez/ aller
SFX aA aller vont/ aller
SFX aA ller llais/ aller
SFX aA ller llait/ aller
SFX aA ller llions/ aller
SFX aA ller lliez/ aller
SFX aA ller llaient/ aller
SFX aA ller llai/ aller
SFX aA ller llas/ aller
SFX aA ller lla/ aller
SFX aA ller llâmes/ aller
SFX aA ller llâtes/ aller
SFX aA ller llèrent/ aller
SFX aA aller irai/ aller
SFX aA aller iras/ aller
SFX aA aller ira/ aller
SFX aA aller irons/ aller
SFX aA aller irez/ aller
SFX aA aller iront/ aller
SFX aA aller irais/ aller
SFX aA aller irait/ aller
SFX aA aller irions/ aller
SFX aA aller iriez/ aller
SFX aA aller iraient/ aller
SFX aA ller ille/ aller
SFX aA ller illes/ aller
SFX aA ller llions/ aller
SFX aA ller lliez/ aller
SFX aA ller illent/ aller
SFX aA ller llasse/ aller
SFX aA ller llasses/ aller
SFX aA ller llât/ aller
SFX aA ller llassions/ aller
SFX aA ller llassiez/ aller
SFX aA ller llassent/ aller
SFX aA aller va/ aller
SFX aA aller vas-y/ aller
SFX aA aller va-en/ aller
SFX aA ller llons/ aller
SFX aA ller llons-y/ aller
SFX aA ller llons-nous-en/ aller
SFX aA ller llez/ aller
SFX aA ller llez-y/ aller
SFX aA ller llez-vous-en/ aller
