vim/st.dic
abécher/c0p+
abéquer/c0p+
abréger/c0p+
accéder/c0p.
accélérer/c0p+
accréter/c0p+
acérer/c0p+
aciérer/c0p+
adhérer/c0p.
adultérer/c0p+
aérer/c0p+
afférer/c0p.
affréter/c0p+
agglomérer/c0p+
agneler/d0p.
agréger/c0p+
aiguilleter/d0p+
aléser/c0p+
aliéner/c0p+
allécher/c0p+
alléger/c0p+
alléguer/c0p+
aller/aA
altérer/c0p+
amonceler/d0p+
anhéler/c0p.
anneler/d0p+
appeler/d0p+
appéter/c0p+
arpéger/c0p+
arriérer/c0p+
assécher/c0p+
asséner/c0p+
assiéger/c0p+
atteler/d0p+
avérer/c0p+
babeler/d0p.
banqueter/d0p.
baqueter/d0p+
baréter/c0p.
barriérer/c0p+
bateler/d0p.
bêcheveter/d0p+
becqueter/d0p+
béguer/c0p.
béquer/c0p+
béqueter/d0p+
blasphémer/c0p+
blatérer/c0p.
bléser/c0p.
bosseler/d0p+
botteler/d0p+
bourreler/d0p+
bréler/c0p+
bretteler/d0p+
breveter/d0p+
briqueter/d0p+
budgéter/c0p+
cacheter/d0p+
cafeter/d0p+
cailleter/d0p.
caleter/d0p+
camembérer/c0p.
canneler/d0p+
capeler/d0p+
caqueter/d0p.
caréner/c0p+
carreler/d0p+
céder/c0p+
célébrer/c0p+
chanceler/d0p.
chapeler/d0p+
chevreter/d0p.
chiqueter/d0p+
chronométrer/c0p+
claqueter/d0p.
claveter/d0p+
cliqueter/d0p.
cogérer/c0p+
colleter/d0p+
commérer/c0p.
compéter/c0p.
compléter/c0p+
concaténer/c0p+
concéder/c0p+
concélébrer/c0p+
concréter/c0p+
confédérer/c0p+
conférer/c0p+
conglomérer/c0p+
considérer/c0p+
coopérer/c0p.
coposséder/c0p+
coqueter/d0p+
cordeler/d0p+
corréler/c0p+
craqueler/d0p+
craqueter/d0p.
crécher/c0p.
crémer/c0p.
créner/c0p+
cureter/d0p+
cuveler/d0p+
débecqueter/d0p+
déblatérer/c0p.
débosseler/d0p+
décacheter/d0p+
décapeler/d0p+
décarreler/d0p+
décéder/c0p+
décélérer/c0p.
décérébrer/c0p+
décerveler/d0p+
décher/c0p+
décheveler/d0p+
déchiqueter/d0p+
déclaveter/d0p+
décliqueter/d0p+
décolérer/c0p.
décolleter/d0p+
décompléter/c0p+
déconsidérer/c0p+
décorréler/c0p+
décréter/c0p+
déféquer/c0p+
déférer/c0p+
déficeler/d0p+
dégénérer/c0p+
dégréner/c0p+
déjeter/d0p+
déléguer/c0p+
démoucheter/d0p+
démuseler/d0p+
dénickeler/d0p+
déniveler/d0p+
denteler/d0p+
dépaisseler/d0p+
dépaqueter/d0p+
déposséder/c0p+
déprotéger/c0p+
dépuceler/d0p+
désaciérer/c0p+
désagglomérer/c0p+
désaliéner/c0p+
désensorceler/d0p+
désespérer/c0p+
déshypothéquer/c0p+
désinsérer/c0p+
désoxygéner/c0p+
dételer/d0p+
détonneler/d0p+
diéser/c0p+
digérer/c0p+
disséquer/c0p+
drapeler/d0p+
duveter/d0p+
ébiseler/d0p+
écheler/d0p+
écher/c0p+
écheveler/d0p+
écolleter/d0p+
embotteler/d0p+
embratteler/d0p+
embreler/d0p+
émécher/c0p+
emmanteler/d0p+
emmuseler/d0p+
émoucheter/d0p+
empaqueter/d0p+
empéguer/c0p+
empenneler/d0p+
empiéter/c0p.
encliqueter/d0p+
enfiévrer/c0p+
engrumeler/d0p+
enjaveler/d0p+
ensorceler/d0p+
enstérer/c0p+
énumérer/c0p+
épanneler/d0p+
épeler/d0p+
épinceler/d0p+
épinceter/d0p+
épousseter/d0p+
étinceler/d0p.
étiqueter/d0p+
éviscérer/c0p+
exaspérer/c0p+
excréter/c0p+
exhéréder/c0p+
exulcérer/c0p+
fardeler/d0p+
faubérer/c0p.
feuilleter/d0p+
ficeler/d0p+
flécher/c0p+
forjeter/d0p+
fréter/c0p+
fuseler/d0p+
gameler/d0p+
gangréner/c0p+
gérer/c0p+
gobeter/d0p+
graveler/d0p+
greneler/d0p+
gréser/c0p+
griveler/d0p+
grommeler/d0p+
grumeler/d0p+
guillemeter/d0p+
handeler/d0p+
hébéter/c0p+
hoqueter/d0p.
hydrogéner/c0p+
impétrer/c0p+
incarcérer/c0p+
indifférer/c0p+
infogérer/c0p+
inquiéter/c0p+
intégrer/c0p+
interférer/c0p.
interjeter/d0p+
interpréter/c0p+
itérer/c0p+
jarreter/d0p+
javeler/d0p+
jeter/d0p+
jumeler/d0p+
lacérer/c0p+
légiférer/c0p.
léser/c0p+
liéger/c0p+
louveter/d0p.
macérer/c0p+
maniérer/c0p+
marqueter/d0p+
métrer/c0p+
modérer/c0p+
moleter/d0p+
morceler/d0p+
moucheter/d0p+
mugueter/d0p+
museler/d0p+
nickeler/d0p+
niveler/d0p+
obérer/c0p+
obséder/c0p+
oiseler/d0p+
opérer/c0p+
pailleter/d0p+
paisseler/d0p+
panteler/d0p.
paramétrer/c0p+
parqueter/d0p+
pelleter/d0p+
pénétrer/c0p+
persévérer/c0p.
péter/c0p+
piéter/c0p+
pipeter/d0p+
piqueter/d0p+
pommeler/d0p+
posséder/c0p+
précéder/c0p+
préférer/c0p+
procéder/c0p.
projeter/d0p+
proliférer/c0p.
protéger/c0p+
raineter/d0p+
rameter/d0p.
rapiécer/c0p+
rapiéceter/d0p+
rappeler/d0p+
râteler/d0p+
réaléser/c0p+
recacheter/d0p+
recarreler/d0p+
recéler/c0p+
recompléter/c0p+
récupérer/c0p+
reficeler/d0p+
refléter/c0p+
réfréner/c0p+
régénérer/c0p+
régner/c0p.
réinsérer/c0p+
réinterpréter/c0p+
rejeter/d0p+
relégiférer/c0p+
rempaqueter/d0p+
rempiéter/c0p+
rengréner/c0p+
renouveler/d0p+
réoxygéner/c0p+
repérer/c0p+
réséquer/c0p+
ressemeler/d0p+
rétrocéder/c0p+
réverbérer/c0p+
riveter/d0p+
rouspéter/c0p.
ruisseler/d0p.
secréter/c0p+
ségréger/c0p+
sidérer/c0p+
soqueter/d0p.
soucheter/d0p+
souffleter/d0p+
sphacéler/c0p+
subdéléguer/c0p+
suggérer/c0p+
sukkeler/d0p.
surjeter/d0p+
surprotéger/c0p+
tacheter/d0p+
taveler/d0p+
tempérer/c0p+
teseter/d0p+
tolérer/c0p+
translittérer/c0p+
triséquer/c0p+
trompeter/d0p+
tûteler/d0p+
ulcérer/c0p+
valeter/d0p.
vénérer/c0p+
vociférer/c0p+
voleter/d0p.
